District of Columbia statutes.
4-204.06

District supplement for Supplemental Security Income recipients.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 406
as added Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-146, § 3, 29 DCR 3151
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-208, § 2(a), 30 DCR 202
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 17(b), 32 DCR 30
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 29, 35 DCR 147
Feb. 27, 1998, D.C. Law 12-53, § 2, 44 DCR 6228

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-204.6.